Massachusetts, session 194th, H199.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 39½ of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the figure “7”, in lines 2 and 12, and inserting in place 
thereof the following figure:- 30.